Massachusetts, session 194th, S1513.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, the
executive office of health and human services, in collaboration with the department of public
health and the emergency medical care advisory board, shall establish a special task force to
issue a report and make recommendations on the structure, support and delivery of emergency
medical services in the commonwealth. The commission shall look at all aspects of emergency
medical services and impact on patient quality of care, including but not limited to: the ability to
designate emergency medical services as an essential service in the commonwealth; workforce
development initiatives; training; compensation; retention; costs versus expenses of care;
reimbursement rates; organization of EMS services; the feasibility of reorganizing the
emergency medical care advisory board within the executive office of public safety and security,
and; local and state support. The task force shall consist of the following members: the secretary
of health and human services or their designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the commissioner of
the department of public health or their designee, who shall service as co-chair; and one
of 3

representative from each of the following organizations: the Massachusetts Health & Hospital
Association; the Massachusetts Ambulance Association; the Professional Fire Fighters of
Massachusetts; Fire Chiefs Association of Massachusetts; the Massachusetts Association of
Behavioral Health Systems; the Association for Behavioral Health Care; the Massachusetts
College of Emergency Physicians, the Massachusetts Emergency Nurses Association, and; the
Massachusetts Senior Care Association.
(b) The task force shall conduct an analysis and issue a report which shall include but not
be limited to: (i) a review of the methodologies used for determining reimbursement rates
affecting the availability of emergency and non-emergency ambulance transport, including a
review of a cost-based method for rate determination, and the potential need to reimburse certain
transports requiring longer transport-times or further geographical distances at a higher rate,
including but not limited to transports to and within the behavioral health system; (ii) an
assessment on the efficacy of the MassHealth non-emergency wheelchair van brokerage
program; (iii) industry-wide workforce initiatives including, but not limited to, strategies to
improve recruitment, training, including but not limited to, transitional training opportunities for
emergency medical services, and cost of training, certification, and licensure ; (iv) impact of
municipal ambulance service contracts being exempt from public bidding requirements; (v)
impact of administrative barriers on access and utilization of non-emergency ambulance
transport; (vi) An analysis of current EMS point of entry protocols in urban, suburban, and rural
settings, including but not limited to the assessment of resource allocation and capacity planning
related to EMS transport; (vii) the role of external economic factors on the development,
sustainability, and retention of the emergency medical service workforce such as the increases in
the minimum wage and competition from other industries; and (IX) recommendations on
of 3

coverage and reimbursement methodology for emerging models, including but not limited to
mobile integrated health and alternative behavioral health transportation.
(c) The task force shall convene its first meeting within 30 days of the effective date of
this act. The task force shall submit its report, including recommendations to address any
statutory, regulatory, budgetary, or other barriers to implementing said recommendations, with
the clerks of the house of representatives and senate, the joint committee on health care
financing, the joint committee on labor and workforce development, joint committee on public
safety and homeland security, and the house and senate committees on ways and means within
six months of the effective date of this act.
of 3